Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5468.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 Sec. 303. (1) Subject to subsection (8), for an individual's name to appear on the official ballot as a candidate for school board member, the candidate shall file a nominating petition and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 the affidavit required by under section 558 with the school district filing official not later than 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday before the election date. The nominating petition must be signed by the following number of electors of the school district: (a) If the population of the school district is less than 10,000 according to the most recent federal census, a minimum of 6 and a maximum of 20. (b) If the population of the school district is 10,000 or more according to the most recent federal census, a minimum of 40 and a maximum of 100. (2) The nominating petition must be substantially in the form prescribed in section 544c, except that the petition must be nonpartisan and must include the following opening paragraph: We, the undersigned, registered and qualified voterselectors of _______________________________________________________ (legal name of school district) and residents of the _______________________________, the (legal name of school district)(city or township) county of _____________________________, state of Michigan, (city or township) nominate __________________________________________________ (name of candidate) _______________________________ ________________________, (street address)(city or township) (city or township)(county) _________________________________________________________, (candidate's website address, if any) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a registered and qualified elector of the district as a member of the board of education of the school district for a term of ______ years, expiring ______, to be voted for at the election to be held on the ______ day of ___________, ______. (month) (year) (3) An individual shall not knowingly sign more nominating petitions for the same office than there are persons individuals to be elected to the office. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor. (4) An individual shall not do any of the following: (a) Sign a nominating petition with a name other than his or her the individual's own name. (b) Make a false statement in a certificate on a nominating petition. (c) If not a circulator, sign a nominating petition as a circulator. (d) Sign a name as circulator other than his or her the circulator's own name. (5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6), an individual who violates subsection (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00, or imprisonment for not more than 93 days, or both. (6) An individual shall not sign a nominating petition with multiple names. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a felony. (7) If an individual signs a nominating petition in violation of this section, any signature by that individual on the petition is invalid and must not be counted. (8) Instead of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 school board member may pay a nonrefundable filing fee of $100.00 to the school district filing official. If this filing fee is paid by the due date for a nominating petition, the payment has the same effect under this section as the filing of a nominating petition. (9) A nominating petition filed under this chapter is subject to the examination and investigation process prescribed in section 552 as to its the nominating petition's sufficiency and the validity and genuineness of the signatures on the nominating petition, and to the other procedures prescribed in that section relevant to a petition filed under this chapter. (10) After a nominating petition is filed or filing fee is paid for a candidate for school board member, the candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless a written withdrawal notice, signed by the candidate, is filed with the school district filing official not later than 4 p.m. of the third day after the last day for filing the nominating petition. If the school district filing official is not a county clerk, the school district filing official shall notify the county clerk of the candidates' names and addresses not later than 3 days after the last day for filing a withdrawal notice. Sec. 386. (1) For an individual's name to appear on the official ballot as a candidate for metropolitan district officer, the candidate shall file a nominating petition and the affidavit required by under section 558 with the metropolitan district election coordinator not later than 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday before the election date. The nominating petitions shall must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the metropolitan district as determined under section 544f. (2) The nominating petition shall must be substantially in the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 form prescribed in section 544c, except that the nominating petition shall must be nonpartisan and shall must include the following opening paragraph: We, the undersigned, registered and qualified voterselectors of the city or township of _______________________________ and residents of the _______________________________, the (legal name of metropolitan district) county of _____________________________, state of Michigan, nominate __________________________________________________ (name of candidate) _______________________________ ________________________, (street address)(city or township) (city or township)(county) _________________________________________________________, (candidate's website address, if any) a registered and qualified elector of the metropolitan district as an officer of the legislative body of the metropolitan district for a term of ____ years, expiring _____, to be voted for at the election to be held on the ______ day of _________________________, ___________________. (month) (year) (3) An elector shall not sign petitions for more candidates than are to be elected. (4) A nominating petition filed under this chapter is subject to the examination and investigation process prescribed in section 552 as to its the nominating petition's sufficiency and the validity and genuineness of the signatures on the nominating petition, and to the other procedures prescribed in that section relevant to a petition filed under this chapter. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (5) After a nominating petition is filed for a candidate for metropolitan district officer, the candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless a written withdrawal notice, signed by the candidate, is filed with the metropolitan district election coordinator not later than 4 p.m. of the third day after the last day for filing the nominating petition. Sec. 544c. (1) A nominating petition must be 8-1/2 inches by 14 inches in size. On a nominating petition, the words "nominating petition" must be printed in 24-point boldface type. "We, the undersigned," et cetera must be printed in 8-point type. "Warning" and language in the warning must be printed in 12-point boldface type. The balance of the petition must be printed in 8-point type. The name, address, and party affiliation of the candidate and the office for which petitions are signed must be printed in type not larger than 24-point. The Subject to section 544g, the nominating petition must be in the following form: NOMINATING PETITION (PARTISAN) We, the undersigned, registered and qualified voterselectors of the city or township of .................. , in the county (strike 1) of ................... and state of Michigan, nominate, .............................................................. , (Name of Candidate) .............................................................. , (Street Address or Rural Route)(City or Township)(County) .............................................................. , (Candidate's Website Address, if any) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 as a candidate of the ................... party for the office of .......................... , .............................................................. , (District, if any) to be voted for at the primary election to be held on the ............ day of ............. , 20 ........ . WARNING A person An individual who knowingly signs more petitions for the same office than there are persons individuals to be elected to the office, signs a petition more than once, or signs a name other than his or her the individual's own name is violating the provisions of the Michigan election law. Printed Street Address Name and or Date of Signing Signature Rural Route Zip Code Mo. Day Year 1. _______________________________________________________________ 2. _______________________________________________________________ 3. _______________________________________________________________ 4. _______________________________________________________________ numbered lines as above CERTIFICATE OF CIRCULATOR The undersigned circulator of the above petition asserts that he or she the circulator is 18 years of age or older and a United States citizen; that each signature on the petition was signed in his or her the circulator's presence; that he or she the circulator has neither caused nor permitted a person an individual to sign the petition more than once and has no knowledge of a person an individual signing the petition more than once; and that, to his or her the circulator's best knowledge and belief, each signature is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the genuine signature of the person individual purporting to sign the petition, the person individual signing the petition was at the time of signing a registered elector of the city or township listed in the heading of the petition, and the elector was qualified to sign the petition. Circulator?Do not sign or date certificate until after circulating petition. ____ If the circulator is not a resident of Michigan, the circulator shall make a cross or check mark on the line provided, otherwise each signature on this petition sheet is invalid and the signatures will not be counted by a filing official. By making a cross or check mark on the line provided, the undersigned circulator asserts that he or she the circulator is not a resident of Michigan and agrees to accept the jurisdiction of this state for the purpose of any legal proceeding or hearing that concerns a petition sheet executed by the circulator and agrees that legal process served on the secretary of state or a designated agent of the secretary of state has the same effect as if personally served on the circulator. ________________________________________________ (Printed Name and Signature of Circulator) (Date) ________________________________________________ (Complete Residence Address (Street and Number or Rural Route)) Do not enter a post office box ________________________________________________ (City or Township, State, Zip Code) ________________________________________________ (County of Registration, if Registered to Vote, of a Circulator who is not a Resident of Michigan) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Warning-A circulator knowingly making a false statement in the above certificate, a person an individual not a circulator who signs as a circulator, or a person an individual who signs a name other than his or her the individual's own name as circulator is guilty of a misdemeanor. (2) The petition must be in a form providing a space for the circulator and each elector who signs the petition to print his or her the circulator's or elector's name. The secretary of state shall prescribe the location of the space for the printed name. The failure of the circulator or an elector who signs the petition to print his or her the circulator's or elector's name, to print his or her the circulator's or elector's name in the location prescribed by the secretary of state, or to enter a zip code or his or her the circulator's or elector's correct zip code does not affect the validity of the signature of the circulator or the elector who signs the petition. A printed name located in the space prescribed for printed names does not constitute the signature of the circulator or elector. If an elector does not include his or her the elector's signature, his or her the elector's street address or rural route, or the date of signing on the petition as required under subsection (1), the elector's signature is invalid and must not be counted by a filing official. (3) If the circulator of a petition under section 482, a qualifying petition for an office named in section 590b(4), or a petition to form a new political party under section 685 is not a resident of this state, the circulator shall indicate where provided on the certificate of circulator that he or she the circulator agrees to accept the jurisdiction of this state for the purpose of any legal proceeding or hearing initiated under section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 476, 552, 590f(2), or 685 that concerns a petition sheet executed by the circulator and agrees that legal process served on the secretary of state or a designated agent of the secretary of state has the same effect as if personally served on the circulator. (4) If the secretary of state or a designated agent of the secretary of state is served with legal process as described in subsection (3), the secretary of state shall promptly notify the circulator by personal service or certified mail at the circulator's residential address as indicated in the certificate of circulator. (5) The circulator of a petition shall sign and date the certificate of circulator before the petition is filed. A circulator shall not obtain electors' signatures after the circulator has signed and dated the certificate of circulator. A filing official shall not count electors' signatures that were obtained after the date the circulator signed the certificate or that are contained in a petition that the circulator did not sign and date. (6) Except as provided in section 544d, a petition sheet must not be circulated in more than 1 city or township and each signer of a petition sheet must be a registered elector of the city or township indicated in the heading of the petition sheet. The invalidity of 1 or more signatures on a petition does not affect the validity of the remainder of the signatures on the petition. (7) An individual shall not sign more nominating petitions for the same office than there are persons individuals to be elected to the office. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor. (8) An individual shall not do any of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Sign a petition with a name other than his or her the individual's own name. (b) Make a false statement in a certificate on a petition. (c) If not a circulator, sign a petition as a circulator. (d) Sign a name as circulator other than his or her the individual's own. (9) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10), an individual who violates subsection (8) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00, or imprisonment for not more than 93 days, or both. (10) An individual shall not sign a petition with multiple names. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a felony. (11) If after a canvass and a hearing on a petition under section 476 or 552 the board of state canvassers determines that an individual has knowingly and intentionally failed to comply with subsection (8) or (10), the board of state canvassers may impose 1 or more of the following sanctions: (a) Disqualify obviously fraudulent signatures on a petition form on which the violation of subsection (8) or (10) occurred, without checking the signatures against local registration records. (b) Disqualify from the ballot a candidate who committed, aided or abetted, or knowingly allowed the violation of subsection (8) or (10) on a petition to nominate that candidate. (12) If an individual violates subsection (8) or (10) and the affected petition sheet is filed, each of the following who knew of the violation of subsection (8) or (10) before the filing of the affected petition sheet and who failed to report the violation to the secretary of state, the filing official, if different, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 attorney general, a law enforcement officer, or the county prosecuting attorney is guilty of a misdemeanor , punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00, or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both: (a) The circulator of the petition, if different than the individual who violated subsection (8) or (10). (b) If the petition is a nominating petition, the candidate whose nomination is sought. (c) If the petition is a petition for a ballot question or recall, the organization or other person sponsoring the petition drive. (13) If after a canvass and a hearing on a petition under section 476 or 552 the board of state canvassers determines that an individual has violated subsection (12), the board of state canvassers may impose 1 or more of the following sanctions: (a) Impose on the organization or other person sponsoring the petition drive an administrative fine of not more than $5,000.00. (b) Charge the organization or other person sponsoring the petition drive for the costs of canvassing a petition form on which a violation of subsection (8) or (10) occurred. (c) Disqualify an organization or other person described in subdivision (a) from collecting signatures on a petition for a period of not more than 4 years. (d) Disqualify obviously fraudulent signatures on a petition form on which a violation of subsection (8) or (10) occurred without checking the signatures against local registration records. (e) Disqualify from the ballot a candidate who committed, aided or abetted, or knowingly allowed a violation of subsection (8) or (10) on a petition to nominate that candidate. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (14) If an individual refuses to comply with a subpoena of the board of state canvassers in an investigation of an alleged violation of subsection (8), (10), or (12), the board of state canvassers may hold the canvass of the petitions in abeyance until the individual complies. (15) A person An individual who aids or abets another in an act that is prohibited by this section is guilty of that act. (16) The provisions of this section except as otherwise expressly provided apply to all petitions circulated under authority of the election law. Sec. 544g. If a nominating petition under section 544c, or a qualifying petition under section 590h, is for a candidate for Representative in Congress, the nominating petition or qualifying petition must indicate if the candidate is a resident of the congressional district from which the candidate seeks to represent. Sec. 590h. (1) A qualifying petition for a candidate without political party affiliation must be the same size and printed in the same type sizes as required in section 544c. The Subject to section 544g, the qualifying petition must be in the following form: QUALIFYING PETITION (CANDIDATE WITHOUT PARTY AFFILIATION) We, the undersigned, registered and qualified voters electors of the city or township of ............, in the county of .......... (strike 1) and state of Michigan, nominate, ............................., (Name of Candidate) ................................. ............................., 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (Street Address or R.R.)(City or Township) (City or Township)(County) .........................................................., (Candidate's Website Address, if any) as a candidate without party affiliation for the office of ........................................................... in (Title of Office and District) order that the name of the candidate be placed without party affiliation on the ballot for the election to be held on the .............. day of ............ , 20.... . WARNING Whoever knowingly signs more petitions for the same office than there are persons individuals to be elected to the office or signs a name other than his or her the individual's own name is violating the Michigan election law. (2) The balance of the qualifying petition form must be substantially as set forth in section 544c. A qualifying petition for a candidate without party affiliation must not contain a reference to a political party. (3) An individual shall not knowingly sign more petitions for the same office than there are persons individuals to be elected to the office. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor. (4) An individual shall not do any of the following: (a) Sign a qualifying petition with a name other than his or her the individual's own name. (b) Make a false statement in a certificate on a qualifying petition. (c) If not a circulator, sign a qualifying petition as a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 circulator. (d) Sign a name as circulator other than his or her the circulator's own name. (5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6), an individual who violates subsection (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00, or imprisonment for not more than 93 days, or both. (6) An individual shall not sign a qualifying petition with multiple names. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a felony. (7) If an individual signs a qualifying petition in violation of this section, any signature by that individual on the petition is invalid and must not be counted.